North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-68.
Fractional shares.

A corporation may issue fractions of a share originally or upon transfer. If it does not issue fractions of a share, then it shall in connection with an original issuance of shares:

Arrange for the disposition of fractional interests by those entitled to them;

Pay in money the fair value of fractions of a share as of the time when persons entitled to receive the fractions are determined; or

Issue scrip or warrants in registered or bearer form that entitle the holder to receive a certificate for a full share upon the surrender of the scrip or warrants aggregating a full share.

A corporation may not pay money for fractional shares if that action would result in the cancellation of more than twenty percent of the outstanding shares of a class or series. A determination by the board of the fair value of fractions of a share is conclusive in the absence of fraud. A certificated or uncertificated fractional share, and any scrip or warrants if expressly provided, entitles the shareholder to exercise voting rights or receive distributions. The board may cause scrip or warrants to be issued subject to the condition the scrip or warrants become void if not exchanged for full shares before a specified date, or that the shares for which scrip or warrants are exchangeable may be sold by the corporation and the proceeds distributed to the holder of the scrip or warrants, or to any other condition or set of conditions the board may impose.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 22; 1999, ch. 95, § 18; 2011, ch. 87, § 16.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-21.

10-19.1-69.
Liability of subscribers and shareholders with respect to shares.

A holder of or subscriber for shares of a corporation is under no obligation to the corporation or its creditors with respect to such shares other than the obligation to pay to the corporation the full consideration of which such shares were issued or to be issued. As such, a shareholder is not personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation.

Any person becoming an assignee or transferee of shares or of a subscription for shares in good faith and without knowledge or notice that the full consideration therefore has not been paid shall not be personally liable to the corporation or its creditors for any unpaid portion of such consideration.

A personal representative, conservator, guardian, trustee, assignee for the benefit of creditors, or a receiver is not personally liable to the corporation as a holder of or subscriber for shares of a corporation but the estate and funds in said person’s hands are liable.

No pledgee or other holder of shares as collateral security is personally liable as a shareholder.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2007, ch. 101, § 15.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-22.

Cross-References.

Liability of directors for illegal distributions, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-95.

10-19.1-70.
Restriction on transfer or registration of securities.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of securities of a corporation may be imposed in the articles, in the bylaws, by a resolution adopted by the shareholders, or by an agreement among or other written action by a number of shareholders or holders of other securities or among them and the corporation. A restriction is not binding with respect to securities issued prior to the adoption of the restriction, unless the holders of those securities are parties to the agreement or voted in favor of the restriction.

A written restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of securities of a corporation which is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances and is noted conspicuously on the face or back of the certificate or included in information sent to the holders of uncertificated shares in accordance with subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-66 is valid and specifically enforceable against the holder of the restricted securities or a successor or transferee of the holder, including a pledgee or a legal representative.

Unless noted conspicuously on the face or back of the certificate or included in information sent to holders of uncertificated shares in accordance with subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-66, a restriction, even though permitted by this section, is ineffective against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

A restriction under this section is deemed to be noted conspicuously and is effective if the existence of the restriction is stated on the certificate and reference is made to a separate record creating or describing the restriction.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1999, ch. 95, § 19; 2005, ch. 100, § 15; 2011, ch. 87, § 17.

10-19.1-71.
Regular meetings of shareholders.

Regular meetings of shareholders may be held on an annual or other less frequent periodic basis but need not be held unless required by the articles or bylaws or by subsection 2.

If a regular meeting of shareholders has not been held during the earlier of six months after the fiscal yearend of the corporation or fifteen months after its last meeting:

A shareholder or shareholders holding five percent or more of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote may demand a regular meeting of shareholders by written notice of demand given to the president or secretary of the corporation.

Within thirty days after receipt of the demand by one of those officers, the board shall cause a regular meeting of shareholders to be called and held at the expense of the corporation on notice no later than ninety days after receipt of the demand.

If the board fails to cause a regular meeting to be called as required by this subsection, the shareholders making the demand may call the meeting by giving notice as required by section 10-19.1-73.

All necessary expenses of the notice and the meeting must be paid by the corporation.

A regular meeting, if any, must be held on the date and at the time and place fixed by, or in a manner authorized by, the articles or bylaws, except that a meeting called by or at the demand of a shareholder pursuant to subsection 2 must be held in the county where the principal executive office of the corporation is located. To the extent authorized by the articles or bylaws, the board may determine that a regular meeting of the shareholders shall be held solely by means of remote communication in accordance with subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-75.2.

At each regular meeting of shareholders:

There must be an election of qualified successors for directors who serve for an indefinite term or whose terms have expired or are due to expire within six months after the date of the meeting.

No other particular business is required to be transacted.

Any business appropriate for action by the shareholders may be transacted.

Failure to hold a meeting in accordance with the articles or bylaws does not affect the validity of a corporate action.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 31; 2003, ch. 85, § 10.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-26.

Collateral References.

Remedies to restrain or compel holding of stockholders’ meetings, 48 A.L.R.2d 615.

Oral evidence as to proceedings at stockholders’ meetings, 48 A.L.R.2d 1259.

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting, 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

10-19.1-72.
Special meetings of shareholders.

Special meetings of the shareholders may be called for any purpose or purposes at any time, by:

The president;

Two or more directors;

A person authorized in the articles or bylaws to call special meetings; or

A shareholder or shareholders holding ten percent or more of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote, except that a special meeting for the purpose of considering any action to directly or indirectly facilitate or effect a business combination, including any action to change or otherwise affect the composition of the board of directors for that purpose, must be called by twenty-five percent or more of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote.

A shareholder or shareholders holding the voting power specified in subdivision d of subsection 1 may demand a special meeting of shareholders by written notice of demand given to the president or secretary of the corporation and containing the purposes of the meeting.

Within thirty days after receipt by one of those officers of the demand, the board shall cause a special meeting of shareholders to be called and held on notice no later than ninety days after receipt of the demand.

If the board fails to cause a special meeting to be called as required by this subsection, the shareholder or shareholders making the demand may call the special meeting by giving notice as required by section 10-19.1-73.

All necessary expenses of the notice and the meeting shall be paid by the corporation.

Special meetings must be held on the date and at the time and place fixed by the president, the board, or a person authorized by the articles or bylaws to call a meeting, except that a special meeting called by or at the demand of a shareholder or shareholders pursuant to subsection 2 must be held in the county where the principal executive office is located. To the extent authorized by the articles or bylaws, the board may determine that a special meeting of the shareholders shall be held solely by means of remote communication in accordance with subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-75.2.

The business transacted at a special meeting is limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting. Any business transacted at a special meeting that is not included in those stated purposes is voidable by or on behalf of the corporation, unless all of the shareholders have waived notice of the meeting in accordance with subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-73.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 24; 1997, ch. 103, § 32; 2003, ch. 85, § 11.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-26.

10-19.1-72.1.
Court-ordered meeting of shareholders.

The district court of the county where the principal executive office of a corporation is located may order a meeting to be held:

On application of a shareholder or shareholders holding five percent or more of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote, if a meeting was not held within the earlier of:

Six months after the fiscal yearend of the corporation; or

Fifteen months after its last meeting; or

On application of a voting shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under section 10-19.1-72 or a person entitled to call a special meeting if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty days after the date the demand was delivered to a corporate officer; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may:

Fix the time and place of the meeting;

Specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting;

Prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice;

Fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters; and

Enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purposes of the meeting.

If the court orders a meeting it may also order the corporation to pay the costs of the shareholder, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred to obtain the order.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 33.

10-19.1-73.
Notice of shareholder meetings.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, notice of all meetings of shareholders must be given to every holder of shares entitled to vote unless:

The meeting is an adjourned meeting to be held not more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting and the date, time, and place of the meeting were announced at the time of the original meeting or any adjournment of the original meeting; or

The following have been mailed by first-class mail to a shareholder at the address in the corporate records and returned nondeliverable:

Two consecutive regular meeting notices and notices of any special meetings held during the period between the two regular meetings; or

All payments of distributions, provided there were at least two sent during a twelve-month period.

If notice of an adjourned meeting is required under subdivision a of subsection 1, then the date for determination of shares entitled to notice of and entitled to vote at the adjourned meeting must comply with subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-73.2, except that if the date of the meeting is set by court order, the court may provide that the original date of determination will continue in effect or may fix a new date.

The notice:

If a specific minimum notice period has not otherwise been fixed by law, must be given at least ten days before the date of the meeting, or a shorter time provided in the articles or bylaws, and not more than fifty days before the date of the meeting;

Must contain the date, time, and place of the meeting;

Must contain the information with respect to dissenters’ rights required by subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-88, if applicable;

Must inform shareholders if proxies are permitted at the meeting and, if so, state the procedure for appointing proxies;

Must contain a statement of the purpose of the meeting, in the case of a special meeting;

Must contain any other information:

Required by the articles or bylaws, or this chapter; or

Considered necessary or desirable by the board of directors; and

May contain any other information considered necessary or desirable by the person or persons calling the meeting.

A shareholder may waive notice of a meeting of shareholders.

A waiver of notice by a shareholder entitled to notice is effective whether given before, at, or after the meeting, and whether given in writing, or by attendance.

Attendance by a shareholder at a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except when the shareholder objects:

At the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened; or

Before a vote on an item of business because the item may not lawfully be considered at that meeting and does not participate in the consideration of the item at that meeting.

An action or meeting that is taken or held without notice under this subdivision has the same force and effect as if notice was given. If the shareholder delivers a written notice of the shareholder’s current address to the corporation, the notice requirement is reinstated.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 25; 1995, ch. 103, § 23; 1997, ch. 103, § 34; 2011, ch. 87, § 18.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-28, 10-19-29.

Cross-References.

Merger or exchange, plan approval, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-98.

Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings, specific reference to purpose of meeting necessary although not a special meeting, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-112.

Collateral References.

Waiver: participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirements for shareholders’ meetings, 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

10-19.1-73.1.
Electronic communications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-19.1-73.2.
Voting rights.

The board may fix or authorize an officer to fix a date not more than fifty days, or a shorter time period provided in the articles or bylaws, before the date of a meeting of shareholders as the date for the determination of the holders of shares entitled to notice of and entitled to vote at the meeting. If a date is fixed, only shareholders on that date are entitled to notice of and permitted to vote at that meeting of shareholders.

A determination of the holders of shares entitled to notice and to vote at a meeting of shareholders is effective for an adjournment of the meeting unless the board fixes a new date for determining the right to notice and to vote, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than fifty days after the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may:

Maintain the original record date for notice and voting; or

Fix a new record date for notice and voting.

A resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present may establish a procedure whereby a shareholder may certify in writing to the corporation that all or a portion of the shares registered in the name of the shareholder are held for the account of one or more beneficial owners. Upon receipt by the corporation of the writing, the persons specified as beneficial owners, rather than the actual shareholder, are deemed the shareholders for the purposes specified in the writing.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, or in the terms of the shares, a shareholder has one vote for each share held.

The articles may give or prescribe the manner of giving a creditor, securityholder, or other person a right to vote under this section.

Shares owned by two or more shareholders may be voted by any one of them unless the corporation receives written notice from any one of them denying the authority of that person to vote those shares.

Except as provided in subsection 7, a holder of shares entitled to vote may vote any portion of the shares in any way the shareholder chooses. If a shareholder votes without designating the proportion or number of shares voted in a particular way, the shareholder is deemed to have voted all of the shares in that way.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 35; 1999, ch. 95, § 20.

10-19.1-73.3.
Voting list.

After fixing a record date for notice of and voting at a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical or numerical list of the identities of all its shareholders entitled to notice and to vote. The list must show:

The number of shares each shareholder is entitled to vote at the meeting;

Each shareholder’s physical mailing address, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s name; and

Each shareholder’s authorized means of receipt for electronic transmissions, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s data address.

The list of shareholders must be available for inspection by a shareholder with voting rights for the purpose of communication with other shareholders concerning the meeting, beginning two business days after the meeting notice is given and continuing through the meeting, at the principal executive office of the corporation or at a reasonable place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held.

The list must also be available at the meeting.

A shareholder or a shareholder’s agent or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and to copy the list, at a reasonable time and at the shareholder’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection and at any time during the meeting or an adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder with voting rights, or the shareholder’s agent or attorney, to inspect the list of shareholders before or at the meeting, the district court of the county where the principal executive office of the corporation is located, on application of the shareholder, may:

Order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense;

Postpone the meeting until the inspection or copying is complete; or

Order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred to obtain the order.

Unless a written demand to inspect and copy a shareholder list has been made under subsection 2 before the shareholder meeting and a corporation improperly refuses to comply with the demand, refusal or failure to comply with this section does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

A shareholder or a shareholder’s agent or attorney who gains access to a shareholder list under this section may not use or give it to another for use of the shareholder list for any purpose other than a proper purpose. Upon application of the corporation, the district court may issue a protective order or order other relief necessary to enforce this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 36; 2019, ch. 94, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

10-19.1-74.
Act of the shareholders.

Unless this chapter or the articles require a greater vote or voting by class and except for the election of directors which is governed by section 10-19.1-39, the shareholders shall take action by the affirmative vote of the holders of the greater of:

A majority of the voting power of the shares present and entitled to vote on that item of business; or

A majority of the voting power of the minimum number of shares entitled to vote that would constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at the meeting.

In any case when a class or series of shares is entitled by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the terms of the shares to vote as a class or series, the matter being voted upon must also receive the affirmative vote of the owners of the same proportion of the shares as is required as provided in subsection 1, unless the articles of incorporation require a larger proportion. Unless otherwise stated in the articles or the bylaws in the case of voting as a class or series, the minimum percentage of the total voting power of shares of the class or series that must be present is equal to the minimum percentage of all shares entitled to vote required to be present under section 10-19.1-76.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, shareholders may take action at a meeting by:

Voice or ballot;

Action without a meeting pursuant to section 10-19.1-75;

Ballot pursuant to section 10-19.1-75.1; or

Remote communication pursuant to section 10-19.1-75.2.

If the articles require a larger proportion or number than is required by this chapter for a particular action, then the articles control.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 27; 1995, ch. 103, § 25; 1997, ch. 103, § 37; 2005, ch. 100, § 16.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-34.

Cross-References.

Proceedings had by a two-thirds vote legal and binding on stockholders or members of corporation, see N.D.C.C. § 1-08-05.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and effect of provision in charter or bylaw requiring super majority vote, 80 A.L.R.4th 667.

10-19.1-74.1.
Contractual requirement to submit matter to shareholders.

A corporation may agree to submit a matter to its shareholders whether or not the board determines, at any time after approving the matter, that the matter is no longer advisable and recommends that the shareholders reject it.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 16.

10-19.1-75.
Shareholder action without a meeting.

An action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the shareholders may be taken without a meeting by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by all of the shareholders entitled to vote on that action.

If the articles so provide, any action may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the shareholders who own voting power equal to the voting power that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the shareholders at which all shareholders were present. However, in no event may written action be taken by holders of less than a majority of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote on that action.

After the adoption of the initial articles, an amendment to the articles to permit written action to be taken by less than all shareholders requires the approval of all of the shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment.

When written action is permitted to be taken by less than all shareholders, all shareholders must be notified of its text and effective date no later than five days after the date on which the action is taken.

Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action.

A shareholder who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions taken by the written actions.

The written action is effective when it has been signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the required shareholders, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action.

When this chapter requires or permits a certificate concerning an action to be filed with the secretary of state, the officers signing the certificate must so indicate if the action was taken under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 38; 2003, ch. 85, § 12; 2005, ch. 100, § 17; 2007, ch. 101, § 17; 2009, ch. 106, §
13.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-27.

Cross-References.

Action by members or directors of nonprofit corporation without a meeting, N.D.C.C. § 10-33-43.

10-19.1-75.1.
Shareholder action by ballot.

Except as provided in subsection 5 and unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, an action that may be taken at a regular or special meeting of shareholders may be taken without a meeting if the corporation mails or delivers a ballot to every shareholder entitled to vote on the matter.

A ballot must set forth each proposed action and provide an opportunity to vote for or against each proposed action.

Approval by ballot under this section is valid only if:

The number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action; and

The number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

Solicitations for votes by ballot must:

Indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

State the percentage of approvals necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors; and

Specify the time by which a ballot must be received by the corporation in order to be counted.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a ballot may not be revoked.

With respect to a ballot by electronic communication:

A corporation may deliver a ballot by electronic communication only if the corporation complies with subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-75.2 as if the ballot were a notice.

Consent by a shareholder to receive notice by electronic communication in a certain manner constitutes consent to receive a ballot by electronic communication in the same manner.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 39; 2005, ch. 100, § 18.

10-19.1-75.2.
Remote communications for shareholder meetings.

This section shall be construed and applied to:

Facilitate remote communication consistent with other applicable law; and

Be consistent with reasonable practices concerning remote communication and with the continued expansion of those practices.

To the extent authorized in the articles or the bylaws and determined by the board:

A meeting of the shareholders may be held solely by any combination of means of remote communication through which the participants may participate in the meeting:

If notice of the meeting is given to every holder of shares entitled to vote as would be required by this chapter for a meeting; and

If the number of shares held by the shareholders participating in the meeting would be sufficient to constitute a quorum at a meeting.

A shareholder not physically present in person or by proxy at a regular or special meeting of shareholders may participate by means of remote communication in a meeting of shareholders held at a designated place.

In any meeting of shareholders held solely by means of remote communication under subdivision a of subsection 2 or in any meeting of shareholders held at a designated place in which one or more shareholders participate by means of remote communication under subdivision b of subsection 2:

The corporation shall implement reasonable measures to:

Verify that each person deemed present and entitled to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a shareholder; and

Provide each shareholder participating by means of remote communication with a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting, including an opportunity to:

Read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with those proceedings;

If allowed by the procedures governing the meeting, have the shareholder’s remarks heard or read by other participants in the meeting substantially concurrently with the making of those remarks; and

If otherwise entitled, vote on matters submitted to the shareholders.

Participation in a meeting by this means constitutes presence at the meeting in person or by proxy if all of the requirements of section 10-19.1-76.2 are met.

With respect to notice to shareholders:

Any notice to shareholders given by the corporation under any provision of this chapter, the articles, or the bylaws by a form of electronic communication consented to by the shareholder to whom the notice is given is effective when given. The notice is deemed given:

If by facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the shareholder has consented to receive notice;

If by electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the shareholder has consented to receive notice;

If by a posting on an electronic network on which the shareholder has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the shareholder of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

If by any other form of electronic communication by which the shareholder has consented to receive notice, when directed to the shareholder.

An affidavit of the secretary, other authorized officer, or authorized agent of the corporation, that the notice has been given by a form of electronic communication is, in the absence of fraud, prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit.

Consent by a shareholder to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication. The corporation is entitled to rely on any consent so given until revoked by the shareholder. However, no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before receipt by the corporation of revocation of the consent.

Any ballot, vote, authorization, or consent submitted by electronic communication under this chapter may be revoked by the shareholder submitting the ballot, vote, authorization, or consent so long as the revocation is received by an officer of the corporation at or before the meeting or before an action without a meeting is effective according to section 10-19.1-75.

Waiver of notice by a shareholder of a meeting by means of authenticated electronic communication may be given in the manner provided in subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-73. Participation in a meeting by means of remote communication described in subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except when the shareholder objects:

At the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened; or

Before a vote on an item of business because the item may not lawfully be considered at the meeting and does not participate in the consideration of the item at that meeting.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 40; 1999, ch. 50, § 13; 2003, ch. 85, § 13.

10-19.1-75.3.
Number of shareholders.

The following identified as a shareholder in a corporation’s current record of shareholders constitutes one shareholder:

Three or fewer co-owners;

A corporation, partnership, trust, estate, or other entity;

The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account; or

One data address.

Shareholdings registered in substantially similar names constitute one shareholder if it is reasonable to believe the names represent the same person.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 94, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

10-19.1-76.
Quorum of shareholders.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a quorum for a meeting of shareholders is the holders of a majority of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote at the meeting.

Except as provided in subdivision b, a quorum is necessary for the transaction of business at a meeting of shareholders.

If a quorum is not present, a meeting may be adjourned from time to time for that reason.

If a quorum has been present at a meeting and shareholders have withdrawn from the meeting so that less than a quorum remains, the shareholders still present may continue to transact business until adjournment.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 41.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-32.

Cross-References.

“Quorum” defined, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-10.

10-19.1-76.1.
Voting of shares by organizations and legal representatives.

Shares of a corporation registered in the name of another domestic or foreign corporation may be voted by the president or other legal representative of the domestic or foreign corporation.

Except as provided in subsection 3, shares of a corporation registered in the name of a subsidiary are not entitled to be voted on any matter.

Shares of a corporation in the name of or under the control of the corporation or a subsidiary in a fiduciary capacity are not entitled to be voted on any matter, except to the extent that the settlor or beneficial owner possesses and exercises a right to vote or gives the corporation or, with respect to shares in the name of or under control of a subsidiary, the subsidiary, binding instructions on how to vote the shares.

Shares under the control of a person in a capacity as a personal representative, an administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or attorney in fact may be voted by the person, either in person or by proxy, without registration of those shares in the name of the person. Shares registered in the name of a trustee of a trust or in the name of a custodian may be voted by the person, either in person or by proxy, but a trustee of a trust or a custodian may not vote shares held by the person unless they are registered in the name of the person.

Shares registered in the name of a trustee in bankruptcy or a receiver may be voted by the trustee or either in person or by proxy. Shares under the control of a trustee in bankruptcy or a receiver may be voted by the trustee or receiver without registering the shares in the name of the trustee or receiver, if authority to do so is contained in an appropriate order of the court by which the trustee or receiver was appointed.

Shares registered in the name of an organization not described in subsections 1 through 5 may be voted either in person or by proxy by the legal representative of that organization.

A shareholder whose shares are pledged may vote those shares until the shares are registered in the name of the pledgee. If the corporation pledges its own shares under subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-93, the corporation may not vote the shares at a meeting or otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 42; 2007, ch. 101, § 18.